src/fst/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON miiHPossessivePrefixes

@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@sií                           miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@nií                           miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@mií                           miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@yií               miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@dií     miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@giyií             miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG4@:@U.PX.SG4@guú                           miiHPossessedStems;

@U.PX.PL1@                                         miiHPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL2@                                         miiHPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@gimií                         miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@guú                   miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@gidií       miiHPossessedStems;

@U.PX.AREAL@:@U.PX.AREAL@guú                       miiHPossessedStems;
@U.PX.GIVEN@:@U.PX.GIVEN@mií                       miiHPossessedStems; ! CHECK
@U.PX.INDEF@:@U.PX.INDEF@ií                        miiHPossessedStems; ! CHECK
@U.PX.RECIP@                                       miiHPossessivePrefixesRecip;

LEXICON miiHPossessivePrefixes12PL
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@nihií       miiHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@nahií     miiHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@nahií   miiHPossessedStems;

LEXICON miiHPossessivePrefixesRecip
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ítłií       miiHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@átłií     miiHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ástłií    miiHPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@átłií   miiHPossessedStems;


LEXICON maaPossessivePrefixes

@U.PX.SG1@:@U.PX.SG1@sáa%                          maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG2@:@U.PX.SG2@náa%                          maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3@:@U.PX.SG3@máa%                          maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3@yáa%              maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@:@U.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@dáa%    maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@:@U.PX.SG3SBJPL3@giyáa%            maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.SG4@:@U.PX.SG4@gwáa%                         maaPossessedStems;

@U.PX.PL1@                                         maaPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL2@                                         maaPossessivePrefixes12PL;
@U.PX.PL3@:@U.PX.PL3@gimáa%                        maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3@gwáa%                 maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@:@U.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@gidáa%      maaPossessedStems;

@U.PX.AREAL@:@U.PX.AREAL@gwáa%                     maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.GIVEN@:@U.PX.GIVEN@áa%                       maaPossessedStems;
@U.PX.INDEF@:@U.PX.INDEF@áa%                       maaPossessedStems; ! CHECK
@U.PX.RECIP@                                       maaPossessivePrefixesRecip;

LEXICON maaPossessivePrefixes12PL
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niháa%      maaPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naháa%    maaPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@naháa%  maaPossessedStems;

LEXICON maaPossessivePrefixesRecip
@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@:@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@ítłáa%      maaPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@átłáa%    maaPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@:@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@ástłáa%   maaPossessedStems;
@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@:@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@átłáa%  maaPossessedStems;


LEXICON Noun
+N:0                                               Tags;

LEXICON SingularNoun
+N+Sg:0                                            Tags;

LEXICON PluralNoun
+N+Pl:0                                            Tags;

LEXICON Tags
@D.PX@                                             #;
@R.PX.SG1@+PxSg1:@R.PX.SG1@                        #;
@R.PX.SG2@+PxSg2:@R.PX.SG2@                        #;
@R.PX.SG3@+PxSg3:@R.PX.SG3@                        #;
@R.PX.SG3SBJSG3@+PxSg3+SbjSg3:@R.PX.SG3SBJSG3@     #;
@R.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@+PxSg3+SbjSg3+CR:@R.PX.SG3SBJSG3COREF@ #;
@R.PX.SG3SBJPL3@+PxSg3+SbjPl3:@R.PX.SG3SBJPL3@     #;
@R.PX.SG4@+PxSg4:@R.PX.SG4@                        #;

@R.PX.PL1@+PxPl1:@R.PX.PL1@                        #;
@R.PX.PL2@+PxPl2:@R.PX.PL2@                        #;
@R.PX.PL3@+PxPl3:@R.PX.PL3@                        #;
@R.PX.PL3SBJ3@+PxPl3+Sbj3:@R.PX.PL3SBJ3@           #;
@R.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@+PxPl3+Sbj3+CR:@R.PX.PL3SBJ3COREF@ #;

@R.PX.AREAL@+PxAreal:@R.PX.AREAL@                  #;
@R.PX.GIVEN@+PxGiven:@R.PX.GIVEN@                  #;
@R.PX.INDEF@+PxIndef:@R.PX.INDEF@                  #;
@R.PX.RECIP@+PxRecip:@R.PX.RECIP@                  #;
